Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 8
Injury or Death of Employees Generally

Publisher's Notes.

The provisions of this chapter may be superseded by the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et seq., with respect to employees covered by that chapter.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1907, No. 69, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1913, No. 175, § 8: approved Mar. 13, 1913. Emergency clause provided: “This Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety of the State, the same shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1917, No. 364, § 2: approved Mar. 24, 1917. Emergency declared.

11-8-101. Definition.

The word “corporation” as used in §§ 11-8-102 — 11-8-108, unless the context otherwise requires, shall include the receiver or other persons charged with the duty of the management and operation of the business of the corporation.

History.

Acts 1913, No. 175, § 6; C. & M. Dig., § 7149; Pope's Dig., § 9135; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1206.

11-8-102. Exception.

Sections 11-8-101 — 11-8-108 shall not apply to railroad corporations and shall not amend nor repeal any part of §§ 23-12-501 — 23-12-507.

History.

Acts 1913, No. 175, § 8; C. & M. Dig., § 7150; Pope's Dig., § 9136; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1208.

11-8-103. Corporations liable for injury or death resulting from negligence.

Every corporation, except while engaged in interstate commerce, shall be liable in damages to any person suffering injury while he or she is employed by the corporation.

In case of death of the employee, the corporation shall be liable to his or her personal representative for the benefit of the surviving widow or spouse and children of the employee or, if no spouse or children exist, then to the employee's parents or, if none, then to the next of kin of the employee for the injury or death resulting in whole or in part from negligence of the corporation or from the negligence of any of the officers, agents, or employees of the corporation.

History.

Acts 1913, No. 175, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 7144; Pope's Dig., § 9130; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1201.

Cross References.

Actions for wrongful death, § 16-62-102.

Coal mining companies, liability, § 11-8-109.

11-8-104. Contributory negligence no bar to recovery.

In all actions brought against any corporation under or by virtue of any of the provisions of §§ 11-8-101 — 11-8-108 to recover damages for personal injuries to an employee, or where the injuries have resulted in his or her death, the fact that the employee may have been guilty of contributory negligence shall not bar a recovery, but the damages shall be diminished by the jury and not by the court in proportion to the amount of negligence attributable to the employee.

However, no employee who may be injured or killed shall be held to have been guilty of contributory negligence in any case where the violation by the corporation of any statute enacted for the safety of employees contributed to the injury or death of the employee.

History.

Acts 1913, No. 175, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 7145; Pope's Dig., § 9131; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1202.

11-8-105. Assumption of risk no defense when safety statute violated.

In any action brought against any corporation under or by virtue of any of the provisions of §§ 11-8-101 — 11-8-108 to recover damages for injuries to, or the death of, any of its employees, the employee shall not be held to have assumed the risks of his or her employment in any case where the violation by the corporation of any statute enacted for the safety of employees contributed to the injury or death of the employee.

History.

Acts 1913, No. 175, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 7146; Pope's Dig., § 9132; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1203.

11-8-106. Contract exemptions void — Setoff for insurance contributions.

Any contract, rule, or device whatsoever, the purpose or intent of which shall be to enable any corporation to exempt itself from any liability created by §§ 11-8-101 — 11-8-108, shall to that extent be void.

However, in any action brought against any corporation under or by virtue of any of the provisions of §§ 11-8-101 — 11-8-108, the corporation may set off therein any sum it has contributed or paid to any insurance relief benefit or indemnity that may have been paid to the injured employee or the person entitled thereto on account of the injury or death for which the action was brought.

History.

Acts 1913, No. 175, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 7147; Pope's Dig., § 9133; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1204; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 774.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (a).

11-8-107. Limitation of action.

No action shall be maintained under §§ 11-8-101 — 11-8-108 unless commenced within three (3) years from the date the cause of action accrued.

History.

Acts 1913, No. 175, § 5; 1917, No. 364, § 1, p. 1789; C. & M. Dig., § 7148; Pope's Dig., § 9134; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1205.

11-8-108. Survival of cause of action.

Any right of action given by §§ 11-8-101 — 11-8-108 to a person suffering injury shall survive to his or her personal representative for the benefit of the surviving spouse and children of the employee and, if none, then of the employee's parents and, if none, then of the next of kin of the employee, but in these cases, there shall be only one (1) recovery for the same injury.

History.

Acts 1913, No. 175, § 7; C. & M. Dig., § 7150; Pope's Dig., § 9136; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1207.

11-8-109. Liability of companies engaged in coal mining.

Every company, whether incorporated or not, engaged in the mining of coal who may employ agents, servants, or employees, those agents, servants, or employees being in the exercise of due care, shall be liable to respond in damages for injuries or death sustained by an agent, employee, or servant when resulting from the careless omission of duty or negligence of the employer or which may result from the carelessness, omission of duty, or negligence of any other agent, servant, or employee of the employer, in the same manner and to the same extent as if the carelessness, omission of duty, or negligence causing the injury or death was that of the employer.

History.

Acts 1907, No. 69, § 1, p. 162; C. & M. Dig., § 7137; Pope's Dig., § 9123; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1209.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may be superseded by § 11-8-103 with respect to corporations covered by § 11-8-103.